Maryland, session 2026, HB1377.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Drop–off site” means a pharmacy, other health care facility, or other entity
participating in a drug donation or repository program and designated by the Board that:
(1) Has voluntarily agreed to accept donated prescription drugs,
over–the–counter drugs, or medical supplies;
(2) Is located within the State or in another state; and
(3) Does not have a final disciplinary order issued against it by a health
occupations board.
(g) “Repository” means a licensed pharmacy that:
– 1 –

Ch. 243 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) If the licensed pharmacy is located in the State, does not have a final
disciplinary order issued against it by the Board of Pharmacy;
(2) Has voluntarily agreed to participate in the Program;
(3) Is located in the State or in another state; and
(4) Has been approved by the Board to:
(i) Accept donated prescription drugs, over–the–counter drugs, or
medical supplies from a designated drop–off site;
(ii) Dispense the donated prescription drugs, over–the–counter
drugs, or medical supplies to eligible patients; or
(iii) Dispose of prescription drugs, over–the–counter drugs, or
medical supplies not accepted for dispensing to eligible patients.
15–602.
(a) There is a Prescription Drug Repository Program regulated by the Board.
(b) The purpose of the Program is to:
(1) Accept prescription drugs, over–the–counter drugs, and medical
supplies donated for the purpose of dispensing to eligible patients; and
(2) Accept prescription drugs, over–the–counter drugs, and medical
supplies returned to a pharmacy for the purpose of proper disposal.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “DEA” means the federal Drug Enforcement Agency.
(3) “Drop–off site” has the meaning stated in § 15–601 of the Health –
General Article.
(4) “Pilot Program” means the Redirecting Safe Prescription Drugs Pilot
Program.
(5) “Repository” has the meaning stated in § 15–601 of the Health –
General Article.
(b) (1) There is a Redirecting Safe Prescription Drugs Pilot Program.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 243
(2) The purpose of the Pilot Program is to:
(i) expand medication access for underserved populations;
(ii) reduce pharmaceutical waste; and
(iii) ensure drug safety and prevent diversion while leveraging safe
medications for public good.
(c) To administer the Pilot Program, the Secretary of Health shall collaborate
with the federal Drug Enforcement Agency and four repositories drop–off sites in the State
that are registered with the DEA to participate in a National Prescription Drug Take Back
Day.
(d) Each repository drop–off site participating in the Pilot Program shall:
(1) coordinate with the DEA to separate and redirect eligible,
noncontrolled, unopened prescription medications collected by the repository drop–off site
during a National Prescription Drug Take Back Day to a State repository program under
Title 15, Subtitle 6 of the Health – General Article;
(2) ensure that collected prescription medications are packaged in a
manner that is consistent with the requirements of § 15–603 of the Health – General
Article;
(3) ensure that controlled substances collected by the repository drop–off
site are provided to the DEA; and
(4) transfer eligible prescription medications collected by the repository
drop–off site to a drop–off site repository.
(e) On or before October 1, 2027, the Secretary of Health shall report to the State
Board of Pharmacy and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, the
General Assembly on:
(1) the total number of eligible prescription medications collected at each
repository drop–off site participating in the Pilot Program during the National Prescription
Drug Take Back Day;
(2) the types of prescription medications collected; and
(3) the number of drugs collected that were not packaged in a manner that
is consistent with the requirements of § 15–603 of the Health – General Article.
– 3 –

Ch. 243 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and 6 months 2 years and, at the end
of December 31, 2027 June 30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 4 –